Illinois, session 104th, SB422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Early Childhood Access Consortium for 5Equity Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 28/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Early 8Childhood Access Consortium for Equity Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-174, eff. 7-28-21.)